Hawaii statutes.
§350-3 Immunity from liability. (a)
Anyone participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this
chapter shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might
be otherwise incurred or imposed by or as a result of the making of such
report. Any such participant shall have the same immunity with respect to
participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from such report.

(b) Any individual who assumes a duty or
responsibility pursuant to section 350-2 or chapter 587A shall have immunity
from civil liability for acts or omissions performed within the scope of the
individual's duty or responsibility. Nothing in this section shall limit the
liability of the department, any other state agency, or any private organization
for the conduct of individuals provided immunity herein. [L 1967, c 261, §4;
HRS §350-3; am L 1986, c 229, §1; am L 1987, c 204, §7 and c 339, §4; am L
2010, c 135, §7]

Case Notes

Cited: 711 F. Supp. 2d 1195 (2010).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next